Idaho, session 2026, H0849.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1004B. CAREER LADDER. School districts shall receive an allocation
for instructional staff and pupil service staff based on their staffs' posi-
tion on the career ladder as follows:
(1) Instructional Except as otherwise provided in this section, in-
structional staff and pupil service staff who are in their first year
of holding an Idaho certificate shall be placed in the first cell of the
residency compensation rung and shall move one (1) cell on the residency com-
pensation rung for each year they hold an Idaho certificate and are employed
in an Idaho public school thereafter for up to three (3) years, at which point
they will remain in the third cell of the residency rung until they earn a
professional endorsement.
(2) Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of
holding a professional endorsement shall be placed in the first cell of the
professional compensation rung.
(3) Instructional Except as otherwise provided in this section, in-
structional staff and pupil service staff on the professional compensation
rung with four (4) years of experience shall move one (1) cell on the profes-
sional compensation rung unless they have failed to meet the professional
compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the previous four
(4) years. Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the professional
compensation rung who meet the performance criteria for three (3) of the
previous five (5) years, one (1) of which must be during the fourth or fifth
year, shall move one (1) cell. Allocations for instructional staff and pupil
service staff who do not meet the professional compensation rung performance
criteria for three (3) of the previous five (5) years, one (1) of which must
be during the fourth or fifth year, shall remain at the previous fiscal year
allocation level. This also applies to the educational allocation.
(4) Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of
holding an advanced professional endorsement shall be placed in the first
cell of the advanced professional compensation rung.
(5) Instructional Except as otherwise provided in this section, in-
structional staff and pupil service staff on the advanced professional
compensation rung who met the performance criteria for the advanced pro-
fessional rung in the previous year shall move one (1) cell on the advanced


professional compensation rung. Allocations for instructional staff and
pupil service staff who do not meet the advanced professional compensation
rung performance criteria shall remain at the previous fiscal year alloca-
tion level. This also applies to the additional education allocation.
(6) Career technical education instructional staff holding an occupa-
tional specialist certificate shall be placed on the career ladder as fol-
lows:
(a) Instructional staff new to or returning to working in an Idaho pub-
lic school:
(i) With two (2) or three (3) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for one (1)
year;
(ii) With four (4) or five (5) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for two (2)
years;
(iii) With six (6) or seven (7) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for three
(3) years; and
(iv) With eight (8) or more years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for four (4)
years; and
(b) Existing career technical education instructional staff on the
residency compensation rung shall have their placement updated con-
sistent with the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection if the
update would result in a rung higher than their current placement.
(7)(a) Career technical education instructional staff holding an oc-
cupational specialist certificate who are placed on the career ladder
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (6) of this section and ini-
tially placed on the professional compensation rung shall move cells on
the professional compensation rung as follows:
(i) Those with one (1) year of experience shall move one (1) cell
on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed to
meet the professional compensation rung performance criteria for
the first year;
(ii) Those with two (2) years of experience shall move one (1) cell
on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed to
meet the professional compensation rung performance criteria in
either of the two (2) years;
(iii) Those with three (3) years of experience shall move one (1)
cell on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed
to meet the professional compensation rung performance criteria
for two (2) of the previous three (3) years; and


(iv) Those with four (4) or more years of experience shall move
according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Allocations for such instructional staff who do not meet the pro-
fessional compensation rung performance criteria in any year shall re-
main at the previous fiscal year allocation level.
(7) (8) Instructional staff or pupil service staff entering their first
year on the career ladder, but with prior certificated instructional, pupil
service, administrative, or equivalent elementary or secondary school ex-
perience, including in an accredited private or parochial school, shall be
placed on the career ladder as follows:
(a) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been awarded a
professional endorsement shall be placed as follows:
(i) Those with four (4) years of certificated experience and doc-
umentation from the hiring school district or charter school ad-
ministrator, attesting the individual has provided evidence that
the individual has met the professional compensation rung perfor-
mance criteria in two (2) of the previous four (4) years, shall be
placed in an equivalent cell on the career ladder to instructional
staff or pupil service staff who have met the movement criteria for
four (4) years; or
(ii) Those with five (5) or more years of certificated experi-
ence and documentation from the hiring school district or charter
school administrator, attesting the individual has provided ev-
idence that the individual has met the professional compensation
rung performance criteria in three (3) of the previous five (5)
years, with one (1) year being the fourth or fifth year, shall be
placed in an equivalent cell on the career ladder to instructional
staff or pupil service staff who have met the movement criteria for
the equivalent number of years as they have verified experience.
(b) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been awarded
an advanced professional endorsement with nine (9) or more years of cer-
tificated experience and documentation from the hiring school district
or charter school administrator, attesting the individual has provided
evidence that the individual has met the professional compensation rung
performance criteria in three (3) of the previous five (5) years, with
one (1) year being the fourth or fifth year, shall be placed in an equiv-
alent cell on the career ladder to instructional staff or pupil service
staff who have met the movement criteria for the equivalent number of
years as they have verified experience.
(9)(a) Pupil service staff new to or returning to working in an Idaho
public school who are certified in and have industry experience in a
field closely related to the position in which they seek to be employed,
and which position is eligible for certificated pupil service staff,
shall be placed on the career ladder as follows:
(i) Those with two (2) or three (3) years of industry experience
in a field closely related to the position in which they seek to
work shall be placed in an equivalent cell to pupil service staff
who have been on the career ladder and met the movement require-
ments for one (1) year;


(ii) Those with four (4) or five (5) years of industry experience
in a field closely related to the position in which they seek to
work shall be placed in an equivalent cell to pupil service staff
who have been on the career ladder and met the movement require-
ments for two (2) years;
(iii) Those with six (6) or seven (7) years of industry experience
in a field closely related to the position in which they seek to
work shall be placed in an equivalent cell to pupil service staff
who have been on the career ladder and met the movement require-
ments for three (3) years; and
(iv) Those with eight (8) or more years of industry experience in
a field closely related to the position in which they seek to work
shall be placed in an equivalent cell to pupil service staff who
have been on the career ladder and met the movement requirements
for four (4) years; and
(b) Existing pupil service staff on the residency compensation rung
shall have their placement updated consistent with the provisions of
paragraph (a) of this subsection if the update would result in a rung
higher than their current placement.
(10)(a) Pupil service staff holding a pupil service staff certificate
who are placed on the career ladder pursuant to subsection (9) of this
section and initially placed on the professional compensation rung
shall move cells on the professional compensation rung as follows:
(i) Those with one (1) year of experience shall move one (1) cell
on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed to
meet the performance criteria for the first year;
(ii) Those with two (2) years of experience shall move one (1) cell
on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed to
meet the professional compensation rung performance criteria in
either of the two (2) years;
(iii) Those with three (3) years of experience shall move one (1)
cell on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed
to meet the professional compensation rung performance criteria
for two (2) of the previous three (3) years; and
(iv) Those with four (4) or more years of experience shall move
according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Allocations for such pupil service staff who do not meet the profes-
sional compensation rung performance criteria in any year shall remain
at the previous fiscal year allocation level.
(11) When determining the placement of instructional staff, pupil ser-
vice staff, or career technical education instructional staff new to or re-
turning to working in an Idaho public school, all experience calculated un-
der subsections (6), (8), and (9) of this section shall be combined.
(8) (12) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applica-
ble cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional
allocation amount for career technical education instructional staff hold-
ing an occupational specialist certificate in the area for which they are
teaching in the amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000), which shall be
designated for career technical education staff and included as part of
their salary.


(9) (13) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applica-
ble cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional
allocation amount for instructional staff and pupil service staff holding
a professional or an advanced professional endorsement who have acquired
additional education and meet the professional or advanced professional
compensation rung performance criteria. In determining the additional ed-
ucation allocation amount, only transcripted credits and degrees on file
with the teacher certification office of the state department of education,
earned at an institution of higher education accredited by a body recognized
by the state board of education or credits earned through an internship or
work experience approved by the state board of education, shall be allowed.
All credits and degrees earned must be in a relevant pedagogy or content area
as determined by the state department of education. Additional education
allocation amounts are not cumulative. Instructional staff whose initial
certificate is an occupational specialist certificate shall be treated as BA
degree-prepared instructional staff. Credits earned by such occupational
specialist instructional staff after initial certification shall be cred-
ited toward the education allocation. Additional education allocations
are:
(a) For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a profes-
sional or an advanced professional endorsement, a baccalaureate degree
and twenty-four (24) or more credits, two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
fiscal year.
(b) For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a profes-
sional or an advanced professional endorsement and a master's degree,
three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per fiscal year.
(c) Effective July 1, 2021, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $40,369 $40,990 $41,611
Professional $42,991 $44,836 $46,681 $48,526 $50,370
Advanced
Professional $52,734 $53,207
(d) Effective July 1, 2022, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $40,742 $41,486 $42,231
Professional $43,488 $45,302 $47,116 $48,930 $50,743
Advanced
Professional $53,478 $54,442 $55,389
(e) Effective July 1, 2023, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $41,118 $41,988 $42,860


Professional $43,990 $45,773 $47,555 $49,337 $51,119
Advanced
Professional $54,233 $55,705 $57,165 $58,613
(f) Effective July 1, 2024, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $41,500 $42,500 $43,500
Professional $44,500 $46,250 $48,000 $49,750 $51,500
Advanced
Professional $55,000 $57,000 $59,000 $61,000 $63,000
(10) (14) Effective July 1, 2025, the educator salary-based apportion-
ment program compensation rung cell amounts shall be adjusted by an amount
equivalent to the salary-based apportionment adjustment for administrative
and classified staff positions.
(11) (15) A review of a sample of evaluations completed by adminis-
trators shall be conducted annually to verify such evaluations are being
conducted with fidelity to the state framework for teaching evaluation,
including each domain and identification of which domain or domains the
administrator is focusing on for the instructional staff or pupil service
staff member being evaluated, as outlined in administrative rule. The re-
view shall be completed prior to November 1 of each year. The state board of
education shall randomly select a sample of administrators throughout the
state. A portion of such administrators' instructional staff and pupil ser-
vice staff employee evaluations shall be independently reviewed. The ratio
of instructional staff evaluations to pupil service staff evaluations shall
be equal to the ratio of the statewide instructional staff salary allowance
to pupil service staff salary allowance. The state board of education, with
input from the Idaho-approved teacher preparation programs and the state
department of education, shall identify individuals and a process to conduct
the reviews. Administrator certificate holders shall be required to par-
ticipate in ongoing evaluation training pursuant to section 33-1204, Idaho
Code. The state board of education shall report annually the findings of
such reviews to the senate education committee, the house of representatives
education committee, the state board of education and the deans of Idaho's
approved teacher preparation programs. The state board of education shall
promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(12) (16) School districts shall submit annually to the state the data
necessary to determine if an instructional staff or pupil service staff
member has met the performance criteria for movement on the applicable
compensation rung. Such data shall include the individuals' performance
on each of the performance criteria as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho
Code, including the percentage of students meeting their measurable student
achievement and student success indicator targets. The department of edu-
cation shall calculate whether or not instructional staff and pupil service
staff have met the compensation rung performance criteria based on the data
submitted during the previous five (5) years. Individually identifiable
performance evaluation ratings submitted to the state remain part of the
employee's personnel record and are exempt from public disclosure pursuant
to section 74-106, Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. That Section 33-1201A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1201A. IDAHO PROFESSIONAL ENDORSEMENT -- ELIGIBILITY. (1) Any in-
structional staff employee or any pupil service staff employee will receive
mentoring as outlined in such employee's individualized professional learn-
ing plan during the initial three (3) years of holding such certificate.
Upon holding a certificate for three (3) years, any such instructional staff
or pupil service staff employee may apply for an Idaho professional endorse-
ment. Upon holding a professional endorsement for five (5) years or more,
any such instructional staff or pupil service staff employee may apply for an
Idaho advanced professional endorsement. Individuals who hold an instruc-
tional staff certificate and a pupil service staff certificate shall have
their experience based on the overall years of experience if held consecu-
tively or the certificate they have held the longest if dually certificated.
(2) To be eligible for an Idaho professional endorsement, the instruc-
tional staff or pupil service staff employee must:
(a) Have held a certificate and been employed in a public school for at
least three (3) years or have completed a state board of education-ap-
proved interim certificate of three (3) years or longer;
(b) Show they met the professional compensation rung performance cri-
teria for two (2) of the three (3) previous years or the third year;
(c) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
and
(d) Have an annual individualized professional learning plan developed
in conjunction with the employee's school district supervisor.
Instructional staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrat-
ing effective teaching that may be considered in exceptional cases for
purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement in the event
required standards for professional endorsement are not met. Pupil service
staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrating effective
student achievement or success that may be considered in exceptional cases
for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement or success
in the event required standards for professional endorsement are not met.
(3) To be eligible for an Idaho advanced professional endorsement, the
instructional staff or pupil service staff employee must:
(a) Have held a renewable certificate and been employed in a public
school for at least eight (8) years or more or have completed a state
board of education-approved interim certificate of three (3) years or
longer and held a renewable certificate and been employed in a public
school for five (5) years or more;
(b) Show they met the professional compensation rung performance cri-
teria for four (4) of the five (5) previous years or the third, fourth,
and fifth year;
(c) During three (3) of the previous five (5) years, have served in
an additional building or district leadership role in an Idaho public
school, including but not limited to:
(i) Instructional specialist or instructional coach;
(ii) Mentor;
(iii) Curriculum or assessment committee member;


(iv) Team or committee leadership position;
(v) Data coach; or
(vi) Other leadership positions identified by the school dis-
trict;
(d) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
(e) Have an annual individualized professional learning plan developed
in conjunction with the employee's supervisor and a self-evaluation;
and
(f)(i) Effective July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2021, show they
have met the advanced professional compensation rung performance
criteria for three (3) of the five (5) previous years or the fifth
year;
(ii) Effective July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, show they have
met the advanced professional compensation rung performance cri-
teria for three (3) of the five (5) previous years or the fourth and
fifth year; or
(iii) Effective July 1, 2022, show they have met the advanced pro-
fessional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of
the five (5) previous years.
Instructional staff employees may provide additional evidence demon-
strating effective teaching that may be considered in exceptional cases
for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement in the
event required standards for the advanced professional endorsement are not
met. Pupil service staff employees may provide additional evidence demon-
strating effective student achievement or success that may be considered
in exceptional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student
achievement or success in the event required standards for the advanced pro-
fessional endorsement are not met.
(4) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been certified
in another state shall be eligible for the professional endorsement if they:
(a) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
(b) Have worked in a certificated position in a compact-member state
other than Idaho pursuant to section 33-4104, Idaho Code; and
(c) Would have been eligible to work in a certificated position in an
Idaho public school based on that certification for three (3) to eight
(8) years.
(5) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been certified
in another state shall be eligible for the advanced professional endorsement
if they:
(a) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
(b) Have worked in a certificated position in a compact-member state
other than Idaho pursuant to section 33-4104, Idaho Code; and
(c) Would have been eligible to work in a certificated position in an
Idaho public school based on that certification for nine (9) years or
more.
(6) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have worked in
an accredited private school and maintained their instructional or pupil
service staff certification may use their years of private school work ex-
perience to meet the years of experience requirements for the professional
and advanced professional endorsement. Such staff may provide additional


evidence demonstrating effective teaching that may be considered in excep-
tional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student achieve-
ment requirements for professional and advanced professional eligibility
criteria.
(7) Pupil service staff and career technical education instructional
staff may use the years of industry experience, as calculated pursuant to
section 33-1004B(6) and (9), Idaho Code, to meet the years of experience
requirements for the professional and advanced professional endorsements.
Such staff may provide additional evidence demonstrating effective teaching
that may be considered in exceptional cases for purposes of determining pro-
ficiency and student achievement requirements for professional and advanced
professional eligibility criteria.
(7) (8) Individuals holding a professional endorsement or an advanced
professional endorsement will be annually evaluated in at least two (2) do-
mains in the state evaluation framework approved by the state board of educa-
tion. All other instructional or pupil service staff employees must be eval-
uated across all domains in the evaluation framework. Ratings in the domains
described in section 33-1001(20)(b), Idaho Code, are required as part of the
advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria.
(8) (9) The state board of education shall promulgate rules implement-
ing the provisions of this section.
(9) (10) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Certificate" means an Idaho instructional certificate, pupil
service staff certificate, or out-of-state educator certificate that
meets the requirements for reciprocity under rules promulgated by the
state board of education;
(b) In conjunction with the Idaho evaluation framework, "individual-
ized professional learning plan" means an individualized professional
development plan based on the Idaho framework for teaching evaluation
and includes, at a minimum, identified interventions based on the indi-
vidual's strengths and areas of needed growth, how the individual will
set student achievement and growth goals, and areas of identified pro-
fessional development and mentoring that target continuous improvement
in professional areas, future student achievement, and school building
or district culture;
(c) "Instructional staff" means those involved in the direct instruc-
tion of a student or group of students and who hold a certificate issued
under section 33-1201, Idaho Code;
(d) "Pupil service staff" means those who provide services to students
but are not involved in direct instruction of those students and who
hold a certificate issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code; and
(e) "School district" means a school district or a public charter
school.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.